District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0225.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Unlocking Housing at Metro Property Tax Exemption Amendment Act
of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 47-1002 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) Paragraph (34) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a semicolon in
its place.
(b) Paragraph (35) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “; and” in
its place.
(c) A new paragraph (36) is added to read as follows:


“(36)(A) Subject to the provisions of subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, a
qualifying development located on land subject to a Joint Development Agreement with the
Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority (“WMATA”).
“(B) The real property tax exemption granted by subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph shall apply only:
“(i) For 20 consecutive real property tax years beginning on the
date that a certificate of occupancy for a qualifying development is issued; and
“(ii) To a qualifying development constructed after January 1,
2026.
“(C) The real property tax exemption granted by subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other tax relief or assistance from any
other source applicable to the qualifying development.
“(D) Nothing in this paragraph shall prevent or restrict WMATA from
utilizing any other tax, development, or other economic incentives available to Joint
Development Agreement partners or the qualifying development, including other tax,
development, or other economic incentives shall set forth in Chapter 38 of this chapter.
“(E) Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to limit WMATA or
Joint Development Agreement partners from appealing or contesting a real estate tax assessment
of a qualifying development.
“(F) For the purposes of this paragraph, the term:
“(i) “Joint Development Agreement” means a contract between
WMATA and a third party to sell or ground lease WMATA property for a qualifying
development; and


“(ii) “Qualifying development” means a real property development
in which:
“(I) Improvements are made to real property subject to a
Joint Development Agreement with WMATA in the District;
“(II) At least 50% of the improvements include the
construction of multifamily residential buildings; provided, that all multifamily residential
buildings located on the property shall be subject to the requirements of Chapter 10 of Title 11-C
of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations; and
“(III) At least 75% of the improvements consist of
buildings that are newly constructed or substantially rehabilitated.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code §1-206.02(c)(1).